test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hammas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hammas: # Noun (14+Gradation) hammas 'eng tooth/est /fin' - full paradigm
     hammas+N+Sg+Nom: hammas
     hammas+N+Sg+Gen: hamba
     hammas+N+Sg+Par: hammast
     hammas+N+Sg+Ill: hambahe
     hammas+N+Pl+Gen: [hambidõ, hammastõ]
     hammas+N+Pl+Par: hambit
     hammas+N+Pl+Ill: [hambihe, hammastõhe]
     hammas+N+Pl+All: [hambilõ, hammastõlõ]

     hammas+N+Sg+Nom: hammas
     hammas+N+Sg+Gen: hamba
     hammas+N+Sg+Par: hammast
     hammas+N+Sg+Ill: [hambahe, hambadõ]
     hammas+N+Sg+Ine: [hamban, hambah, hambahn]
     hammas+N+Sg+Ela: hambast
     hammas+N+Sg+All: hambalõ
     hammas+N+Sg+Ade: hambal
     hammas+N+Sg+Abl: hambalt
     hammas+N+Sg+Tra: hambas
     hammas+N+Sg+Ter: hambaniq
     hammas+N+Sg+Abe: hambaldaq
     hammas+N+Sg+Com: hambagaq
     hammas+N+Pl+Nom: hambaq
     hammas+N+Pl+Gen: [hambidõ, hammastõ]
     hammas+N+Pl+Par: [hambit, hambiid]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ill: [hambihe, hambiihe, hambidõ, hambiidõ, hammastõhe]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ine: [hambin, hambiin, hambih, hambiih, hambihn, hambiihn, hammastõn, hammastõh, hammastõhn]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ela: [hambist, hambiist, hammastõst]
     hammas+N+Pl+All: [hambilõ, hambiilõ, hammastõlõ]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ade: [hambil, hambiil, hammastõl]
     hammas+N+Pl+Abl: [hambilt, hambiilt, hammastõlt]
     hammas+N+Pl+Tra: [hambis, hambiis, hammastõs]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ter: [hambiniq, hambiiniq, hammastõniq]
     hammas+N+Pl+Abe: [hambildaq, hambiildaq, hammastõldaq]
     hammas+N+Pl+Com: [hambidõgaq, hambiidõgaq, hammastõgaq]
